Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB226.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definition of "State-affiliated entity" in section 102 of the act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Right-to-Know Law, is amended to read:Section 102. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"State-affiliated entity." A Commonwealth authority or Commonwealth entity. The term includes the Pennsylvania Higher 12345678910111213141516171819202122 Education Assistance Agency and any entity established thereby, the Pennsylvania Gaming Control Board, the Pennsylvania Game Commission, the Pennsylvania Fish and Boat Commission, the Pennsylvania Housing Finance Agency, the Pennsylvania Municipal Retirement Board, the State System of Higher Education, a community college, the Pennsylvania Turnpike Commission, the Pennsylvania Public Utility Commission, the Pennsylvania Infrastructure Investment Authority, the State Public School Building Authority, the Pennsylvania School Boards Association, the Pennsylvania Interscholastic Athletic Association and the Pennsylvania Higher Educational Facilities Authority. The term does not include a State-related institution.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0226PN0179 - 2 - 1234567891011121314